Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201448-437
High voltage lines;
prohibited acts.

(1) No
person, firm, or corporation, or agent of such person,
firm, or corporation, shall require or permit any employee, except
an authorized and qualified person, to perform and no person, except an authorized
and qualified person, shall perform any function within the distances from
overhead high voltage conductors prohibited by sections 48-436 to 48-442;
or enter upon any land, building, or other premises, and there to engage in
any excavation, demolition, construction, repair, or other operations, or to erect, install,
operate, or store
in or upon such premises any tools, machinery, equipment, materials, or structures,
including house-moving, well-drilling, pile-driving, or hoisting equipment, within the distances
from overhead high voltage conductors prohibited by sections 48-436 to 48-442,
unless and until danger from accidental contact with such high voltage conductors
has been effectively guarded against in the manner prescribed in sections
48-436 to 48-442.

(2) No person
except an authorized and qualified person shall manipulate overhead high voltage
conductors or other components, including the poles and other structures,
of an electric utility. Under no circumstances shall an authorized and qualified
person work on the electrical system of an electric utility that he or she
is not employed by unless written authorization has been obtained from such
electric utility. This subsection shall not be construed to apply to activities
performed by an authorized and qualified person employed by an electric utility
on the electrical system of another electric utility when the nonowning or
nonoperating electric utility has a written agreement with the owning and
operating electric utility (a) providing for the joint use of or interconnection
of the electrical systems of both the electric utilities or (b) approving
authorized and qualified persons employed by the nonowning or nonoperating
electric utility to work on the electrical system of the owning or operating
electric utility on an ongoing basis.

Laws 1969, c. 390, § 2, p. 1371;

Laws 2012, LB997, § 2.